Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 1
PLATS OF CITIES AND TOWNS

Cross references:

For vacation of streets and alleys, see part 3 of article 2 of title 43.

31-23-101. Plats of cities and towns organized prior to 1885.

In all cases in which a city or town was organized prior to March 31, 1885, in which lands embraced within the boundaries thereof have been conveyed or known by lots, blocks, streets, highways, parks, squares, or other divisions of land or in which any such lots, blocks, streets, highways, parks, squares, or other divisions of land have been known as such by reference to some previous plat or map, whether prepared or submitted in accordance with law or not, the owners of such lands, in order to determine the location and boundaries thereof, may cause a plat of the same to be filed in accordance with the provisions of this part 1.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1143, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-1-401 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-23-102. Application to other cities or towns.

The provisions of this part 1 are applicable to lands within the boundaries of cities and towns organized on or after March 31, 1885, to the extent that any owners of lands therein desire to make any change in the plat of any such city or town from the plat as originally made.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1144, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-1-405 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-23-103. Plats of whole municipal area.

When any such plat embraces in its description the whole municipal area of any such city or town, it shall set forth, as near as may be:

All streets and highways and the width thereof;

All parks, squares, and other grounds reserved for public uses with the boundaries and dimensions thereof;

All lots and blocks and other divisions of land, with their boundaries, designating such lots and blocks by numbers and giving the dimensions of such lots and other divisions of land.

Reference shall be made in said plat to one or more permanent monuments. The scale of said plat shall be indicated therein, and any other matters necessary or proper to clarify the descriptions of lands indicated on any such plat may be entered thereon.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1144, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-1-402 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-23-104. Acknowledgment of plat.

Any such plat shall be acknowledged in the manner of a deed by the owners and proprietors of the lands designated upon any such plat before some officer authorized to take the acknowledgment of deeds. A copy thereof so acknowledged shall be filed in the office of the county clerk and recorder of the county where such lands are situated and also in the office of the clerk of any such city or town. When any such plat embraces in its description any street, highway, park, square, or other lands owned or held by the city or town for any public use or otherwise, said plat shall be acknowledged in behalf of the city or town by the mayor of the city or town when authorized by the resolution or ordinance of the governing body. Any such acknowledgment of any owner or proprietor may be made for such owner or proprietor by any attorney-in-fact duly authorized by deed.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1144, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-1-403 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-23-105. Plats of portion of municipal area.

A plat of any portion of such municipal area may be filed, and any number of such plats may be filed. When any plat is filed containing a description of any less than all of the municipal area, the same matters shall be indicated upon such plat, to the extent of lands described in such plat, as are required to be indicated in a plat of the whole municipal area, as near as may be. Every plat shall be acknowledged by such owner and proprietor whose lands are embraced within the description of such plat.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1144, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-1-404 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-23-106. How parcels designated.

In case of filing any such plat under this part 1, the designation by which any lot, block, or other parcel of land has previously been known shall be retained in said plat. With the consent of the city or town, any such lot, block, or other parcel of land specified in said plat may be designated by other numbers or names than those by which said lots, blocks, or other parcels of land have been previously known. Such consent of any such city or town, through its governing body, shall be evidenced by the acknowledgment of the mayor. In case of tracts or parcels of land within any such city or town which have not been known or platted by lots, blocks, or other parcels of land of a designated number or name, the same may be platted as provided in section 31-23-105 upon the consent of the city or town as provided in this section.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1144, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-1-406 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-23-107. Public property dedicated.

All streets, parks, and other places designated or described as for public use on the map or plat of any city or town or of any addition made to such city or town are public property and the fee title thereto vested in such city or town.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1145, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-1-108 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-23-108. Record and preservation - definition.

The county clerk and recorder shall record all such plats of lands within his or her county together with the description, acknowledgment, or other writing thereon in a book to be kept for that purpose and, when necessary, may reduce the scale of any such plat. Upon each record in the book he or she shall endorse his or her certificate that the same is truly recorded from the original plat filed in his or her office. The county clerk and recorder may receive an original plat for recording in an electronic format. The county clerk and recorder shall preserve the original plat in the original format, an electronic format, or both. If the plat is received for recording in the original format, the county clerk and recorder may preserve it in an electronic format by digitizing or scanning the plat at a minimum resolution of three hundred dots per inch. The county clerk and recorder shall keep an index to such book of plats, which index shall contain the names of the parties acknowledging such plats and the name of the city or town, as the case may be. The county clerk and recorder shall likewise make entries of all the plats in the index in his or her office in which deeds are required to be entered. As used in this section, "electronic" means relating to technology having electrical, digital, magnetic, wireless, optical, electromagnetic, or similar capabilities.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1145, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2017:

Entire section amended, (SB 17-129), ch. 213, p. 832, § 1, effective August 9.

L. 2020:

Entire section amended, (HB 20-1318), ch. 239, p. 1157, § 1, effective September 14.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-1-407 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-23-109. Plats shall be evidence.

All such original plats, the record thereof, or copies therefrom, certified by the county clerk and recorder of such county, shall be evidence in all courts and places.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1145, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-1-408 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-23-110. Boundaries settled by plat.

Upon the filing of any such plat in the office of the county clerk and recorder, the boundaries of contiguous divisions of land, as described in section 31-23-103, upon any such plat shall be determined and settled as indicated in the plat. All the other matters indicated upon said plat are binding upon the parties acknowledging such plat. For the purpose of description in any instrument affecting title to any land described in any such plat, the designation given upon such plat shall be sufficient.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1145, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-1-409 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-23-111. Owner construed.

For the purposes of this part 1, any person having a legal or equitable interest in any lands shall be deemed an owner and proprietor. Nothing in this part 1 shall affect the rights of anyone other than those acknowledging any such plat.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1145, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-1-410 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-23-112. Fees of recorder.

The county clerk and recorder shall receive the same fees for filing and recording the plats provided for by this part 1 as are allowed for filing and recording original maps or plats of cities or towns.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1145, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-1-411 as it existed prior to 1975.

Cross references:

For fees for filing and recording maps or plats, see § 30-1-103.